Utah statutes.
19-8-115.   Rules -- Public notice -- Participation.

The department shall make rules as necessary to administer this chapter.  The rules shall include provisions for public participation by, and notice to, affected property owners regarding voluntary cleanup decisions.



Enacted by Chapter 247, 1997 General Session

